Utah statutes.
61-2a-7.   Court determination and order.
If the court determines that a claim should be levied against that portion of
the fund allocated for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this
chapter, the court shall enter an order directed to the division requiring
payment from the fund of that portion of the petitioner's judgment that is
payable from the fund pursuant to Section 61-2a-5.
